Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.120

Conviction of public officer forfeits trust.

The conviction of a public officer of any felony or malfeasance in office shall entail, in addition to such other penalty as may be imposed, the forfeiture of his or her office, and shall disqualify him or her from ever afterward holding any public office in this state.

[ 2011 c 336 s 333; 1909 c 249 s 37; RRS s 2289.]

NOTES:

Forfeiture or impeachment, rights preserved: RCW 42.04.040.

Misconduct of public officers: Chapter 42.20 RCW.

Vacancy of public office, causes: RCW 42.12.010.